test/src/morphology/N-klaadd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - klaaˊdd a-stem tavara: # Noun - full paradigm
     klaaˊdd+N+Sg+Nom: klaaˊdd
     klaaˊdd+N+Sg+Gen: klaaˊdd
     klaaˊdd+N+Sg+Acc: klaaˊdd
     klaaˊdd+N+Sg+Ill: klaaˊdde
     klaaˊdd+N+Sg+Loc: klaaˊddest
     klaaˊdd+N+Sg+Com: klaaˊddin
     klaaˊdd+N+Ess: klaaˊdden
     klaaˊdd+N+Par: klaaˊdded
     klaaˊdd+N+Sg+Abe: klaaˊddtää
     klaaˊdd+N+Pl+Nom: klaaˊdd
     klaaˊdd+N+Pl+Gen: klaaˊddi
     klaaˊdd+N+Pl+Acc: klaaˊddid
     klaaˊdd+N+Pl+Ill: klaaˊddid
     klaaˊdd+N+Pl+Loc: klaaˊddin
     klaaˊdd+N+Pl+Com: klaaˊddivuiˊm
     klaaˊdd+N+Pl+Abe: klaaˊdditää
